Massachusetts, session 194th, H3289.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 36A of Chapter 30 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the end
of the first paragraph the following new paragraph:—
Any state motor vehicle or a motor vehicle owned by a state authority, including
construction and snow removal equipment, that has been determined to be surplus property and
no longer useable by the Commonwealth shall be offered at sale or auction to the cities and
towns of the Commonwealth. The Executive Office of Administration and Finance shall
promulgate rules and regulations that establish guidelines for such sales and auctions including
but not limited to notice payment, delivery and liability. Any motor vehicle that is not sold or
auctioned off in this manner may then be made available to the general public for sale and/or
of 2

auction. For the purpose of this section, motor vehicle shall be defined as any vehicle constructed
and designed for propulsion by power other than muscular strength including any such vehicles
pulled or towed by another motor vehicle.
of 2